Hawaii, session 2025, GM1312.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature appreciates the sanctity of
life and acknowledges that vehicular pursuits involving law
enforcement are inherently dangerous due to the conditions of
the State's roads.
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to statutorily
establish statewide vehicular law enforcement pursuit policies.
SECTION 2. Chapter 139, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated
and to read as follows:
"§139- Vehicular pursuit. (a) 'Beginning January 1,
2027, no law enforcement officer shall engage in a vehicular
pursuit unless:
(1) The law enforcement officer has a reasonable suspicion
to believe that a person in the vehicle to be pursued
is attempting to commit, has committed, or is
committing one or more of the following:
2025-3481 HB277 CDl HMSO
iniHillllllilllUMil

Page 2 277
H.B. NO
H.D. 2
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
(A) A^el£n^;of fense under chapter 707 or 7 08 tli^
involves physical injury to the person or
another, or the threat, or significant risk, of
physical injury to a person or another;
(B) The offense of kidnapping, unlawful imprisonment
in the first or second degree, or custodial
interference in the first or second degree under
part IV of chapter 707;
(C) The offense of robbery in the first or second
degree under part V of chapter 708;
(D) A sexual offense under part V of chapter 707;
(E) Assault in the first degree under section 707-710
or assault in the second degree under section
707-711 by a person operating a vehicle:
(i) In a reckless manner; or
(ii) Without regard for the safety of others;
(F) The offense of abuse of family or household
members under section 709-906;
(G) The offense of escape in the first degree under
section 710-1020;
2025-3481 HB277 GDI HMSO
inniiMiiiiiiiiiiiiiiii

Page 3
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(H) The offense of escape in the second degree under
section 710-1021; or
(I) The offense of operating a vehicle under the
influence of an intoxicant under section 291E-61;
(2) The vehicular pursuit is necessary to identify or
apprehend the person;
(3) The person poses a serious risk of harm to others and
the law enforcement officer reasonably believes that,
under the circumstances, the safety risks of failing
to identify or apprehend the person are greater than
the safety risks of the vehicular pursuit; and
(4) The pursuing law enforcement officer notifies a
supervising law enforcement officer immediately upon
initiating the vehicular pursuit; provided that:
(A) The supervising law enforcement officer oversees
the vehicular pursuit; and
(B) The pursuing law enforcement officer, in
consultation with the supervising law enforcement
officer, considers:
(i) Alternatives to the vehicular pursuit;
2025-3481 HB277 GDI HMSO

Page 4 277
H.B. NO
H.D. 2
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
(ii) The justification for the vehicular pursuit;
and
(iii) Other safety factors, including speed,
weather, traffic, road conditions, and any
known presence of minors in the vehicle.
(b) Beginning January 1, 2027, in any vehicular pursuit
under this section;
(1) The pursuing law enforcement officer and the
supervising law enforcement officer shall comply with
any applicable procedures for designating the primary
pursuit vehicle and determining the appropriate number
of vehicles permitted to engage in the vehicular
pursuit,-
(2) The supervising law enforcement officer, pursuing law
enforcement officer, or dispatcher shall notify other
law enforcement agencies that may be affected by the
vehicular pursuit or called upon to assist with the
vehicular pursuit;
(3) To the extent practicable, the pursuing law
enforcement officer shall use a common radio channel
or other direct means of communication to directly
2025-3481 HB277 GDI HMSO

iiHiiiiiHBinininiiiii

Page 5
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
communicate with other law enforcement officers
engaging in the vehicular pursuit, the supervising law
enforcement officer, and the dispatching law
enforcement agency;
(4) As soon as practicable after initiating a vehicular
pursuit, the pursuing law enforcement officer,
supervising law enforcement officer, or responsible
law enforcement agency shall develop a plan to end the
vehicular pursuit through the use of available pursuit
intervention options, techniques, or tactics approved
by the applicable law enforcement agency; and
(5) Upon initiation of a pursuit, the pursuing law
enforcement officer or officers shall immediately
activate all emergency warning lights, siren,
headlights, motor vehicle recorder, and body-worn
camera. If a law enforcement officer terminates a
pursuit without stopping the pursued vehicle, upon
terminating the pursuit, the pursuing law enforcement
officer or officers shall immediately cease all
emergency vehicle operations, including turning off
2025-3481 HB277 GDI HMSO
lunniiimiimiiHiini

Page 6
H.B. NO.
hk2
C.D. 1
all emergency warning lights and sirens and
disengaging from the fleeing vehicle.
(c) Beginning January 1, 2027, any law enforcement officer
who engages in a vehicular pursuit that fails to satisfy the
requirements of this section shall terminate the pursuit. The
supervising law enforcement officer shall order the pursuing law
enforcement officer to terminate the pursuit as soon as the
supervising law enforcement officer determines that the pursuit,
or continued pursuit, would not be authorized under this
section.
(d) Beginning January 1, 2027, no law enforcement officer
shall fire a weapon at, into, or from a moving vehicle unless;
(1) It is necessary to protect against an imminent risk of
serious physical harm or death to an officer or
another; and
(2) The imminent risk cannot be avoided through other
reasonable means, including by avoiding the path of
the vehicle.
(e) Beginning January 1, 2027, each law enforcement agency
shall annually furnish to the department of the attorney
general, in a manner defined and prescribed by the department of
2025-3481 HB277 GDI HMSO
HMIIHHIIIIIHIIUII

Page 7
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
the attorney general, a report of all vehicular pursuits
conducted in the prior year by law enforcement officers employed
by the law enforcement agency.
(f) Each report required under subsection (e) shall
include, at a minimum, the following information for each
vehicular pursuit:
(1) The reason for the pursuit, including the offenses or
infractions that served as a basis for the pursuit;
(2) The date, start time, and end time of the pursuit;
(3) The start and end locations of the pursuit;
(4) A summary of the circumstances surrounding the
pursuit, including but not limited to the number of
law enforcement officers involved, the number of law
enforcement vehicles involved, weather conditions, the
type of law enforcement vehicles and pursued vehicles
involved (e.g., motorcycle or sedan), and maximum
speeds;
(5) Whether a body-worn camera was worn and active for the
duration of the pursuit;
(6) Whether a dashboard camera was present and active for
th^djjraXion of th^gur;sud^
2025-3481 HB277 CDl HMSO
iHiiniMiiiifliiiia

Page 8 277
H.B. NO
H.D. 2
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
(7) Whether the pursuit resulted in a crash or collision;
injury requiring medical treatment; or death to a law
enforcement officer, a driver or passenger in the
pursued vehicle, or an uninvolved third party;
(8) If the pursuit resulted in a crash or collision,
injury requiring medical treatment, or death, a
description of the accident and details of each law
enforcement officer, driver or passenger, or
uninvolved third party injured or killed, including
the type and severity of the injuries sustained by
each, if any;
(9) Why and how the pursuit was discontinued or
terminated, including whether the law enforcement
officer used any pursuit intervention tactics or
tools, and if so, which tactics or tools;
(10) Unique identification numbers for each pursuing and
supervising law enforcement officer;
(11) If a citation was issued, the violations cited;
(12) If an arrest was made, the offense charged; and
(13) Whether the law enforcement officer searched the
person or any property, and, if so, the type of
2025-3481 HB277 GDI HMSO
IIIDHIHIIIHnillil

Page 9 H.B. NO. "n.
C.D. 1
search, the basis for the search, and the type of
contraband or evidence discovered, if any.
(g) The department of the attorney general shall make all
information obtained from law enforcement agencies under
subsection (e) publicly available on the department of the
attorney general's website, classified by law enforcement
agency, in a manner that is clear, understandable, and machine-
readable .
(h) No law enforcement agency shall report or make
publicly available the name, address, social security number, or
other unique personal identifying information of the persons
pursued. Law enforcement agencies shall be solely responsible
for ensuring that personal identifying information of
individuals pursued is not transmitted to the department of the
attorney general or otherwise released to the public.
(i) No later than:
(1) July 1, 2026, the department of the attorney general
shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 regarding the
collection and reporting of data required under this
section;
2025-3481 HB277 CDl HMSO 9
iNinumiiiwniiiiiiiiniii

Page 10 H.B. NO. SS.2
C.D. 1
(2) July 1, 2026, the board shall develop a model
vehicular pursuit policy that is consistent with the
requirements of this section and shall seek public
comment on the policy in accordance with chapter 91;
provided that in its policy, the board shall include
guidance on:
(A) Supervisory review and investigation of pursuits;
ar^
(B) The use of pursuit intervention tools and
tactics, including but not limited to vehicle
paralleling and vehicle contact action;
(3) January 1, 2027, each law enforcement agency in the
State shall adopt a written policy that is consistent
with:
(A) The requirements of this section;
(B) The board's model vehicular pursuit policy; and
(C) The department of the attorney general's rules
regarding the collection and reporting of data;
and
(4) January 1, 2027, each law enforcement agency shall
make publicly available all of its policies, including
2025-3481 HB277 GDI HMSO 10

Page 11
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
procedures, general orders, special orders,
regulations, and guidance, related to vehicular
pursuits.
(j) The policies under subsection (i)(4) shall be presumed
to be a public record. Redaction of limited portions of these
policies shall be permitted only if:
(1) They would be permitted under chapter 92F; and
(2) The redacted material, if made public, would
substantially and materially undermine ongoing
investigations or endanger the life or safety of
officers or members of the public.
(k) The policies under subsection (i)(4), including their
component procedures, general orders, special orders,
regulations, and guidance, related to vehicular pursuits, shall
include the month and year during which they were last updated.
(1) If any law enforcement agency adopts new or revised
policies under subsection (i)(4), the policies shall be made
publicly available within thirty days of the adoption.
(m) The board shall develop minimum requirements for both
introductory and in-service training for law enforcement
officers and supervising law enforcement officers on vehicular
2025-3481 HB277 CDl HMSO 1
■■IHlHIINIIIIlim

Page 12 H.B. NO. ^.2
I . . I -a V g 2
C.D. 1
pursuits to explain the requirements of this section and any
implementing rules and guidance. The board shall require law
enforcement officers and supervising law enforcement officers to
complete in-service training on vehicular pursuits every two
years.
(n) Each law enforcement agency shall, as part of its
pursuit policies, make clear to law enforcement officers and
supervising law enforcement officers that any violation of the
policies shall result in discipline, up to and including
termination.
(o) The attorney general may investigate and, if
wa^T^jited j^r3m2 a civiJ^aut ion a£adnst arry J^a2^en^drcement
■I< O'y agency to obtain equitable or’declaratory relief to enforce this
section.
(p) For the purposes of this section;
"Law enforcement agency" has the same meaning as in section
78-52.
"Law enforcement vehicle" means a county law enforcement
vehicle, department of law enforcement vehicle, or department of
land and natural resources division of conservation and
2025-3481 HB277 GDI HMSO

■■liininiNiiiM

Page 13 277
H.B. NO
H.D. 2
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
resources enforcement vehicle authorized and approved pursuant
to section 291-31.5.
''Vehicle" has the same meaning as in section 286-2.
"Vehicle contact action" means any action undertaken by the
pursuing law enforcement officer intended to result in contact
between the moving law enforcement vehicle and the pursued
vehicle.
"Vehicle paralleling" means a deliberate offensive tactic
by one or more law enforcement vehicles where they are driven
alongside the pursued vehicle while the pursued vehicle is in
motion.
"Vehicular pursuit" or "pursuit" means an attempt by a law
enforcement officer in a law enforcement vehicle to stop a
moving vehicle where the operator of the moving vehicle appears
to be aware that the law enforcement officer is signaling the
operator of the moving vehicle to stop the vehicle and the
operator of the moving vehicle appears to wilfully resist or
ignore the law enforcement officer's attempt to stop the vehicle
by increasing vehicle speed, making evasive maneuvers, or
operating the vehicle in a reckless manner that endangers the
safety of the community or law enforcement officer.
2025-3481 HB277 CDl HMSO

HiiHiiHininiiiiii

Page 14
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
Following a vehicle whose operator fails to yield to the
law enforcement officer's signal to stop for a brief period of
time no longer than necessary to obtain basic information about
the vehicle and its occupants shall not constitute a pursuit if
both the law enforcement officer and operator continue to
substantially obey all other traffic laws during the brief
period the officer is following the operator, and the officer
reasonably believes that briefly following the vehicle would not
increase the threat that either the operator’s or the officer's
driving poses a danger to the safety of the public or other
officers."
SECTION 3. This Act does not affect rights and duties that
matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were
begun before its effective date.
SECTION 4. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2025-3481 HB277 CDl HMSO 14
liHIMflllWHIlilH

277
H.B. NO
H.D. 2
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 25th day of June , 2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 277, HD 2, SD 2, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 277, H.D. 2, S.D. 2, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate